Hawaii statutes.
[§668A-13] Uniformity of application and
construction. In applying and construing this chapter, consideration shall
be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its
subject matter among the states that enact similar uniform legislation. [L
2016, c 260, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next